Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.010

Declaration.

The legislature hereby declares that the public has an interest in the conservation, preservation, and protection of the state's archaeological resources, and the knowledge to be derived and gained from the scientific study of these resources.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 134 s 1.]